Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 7. Common Carrier Approval.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.750.
Common carrier approval.

A common carrier may not transport or deliver alcoholic beverages to a person in the state unless the board has approved the common carrier under (b) of this section.

A common carrier may apply to the board, on a form prescribed by the board, for approval to transport and deliver alcoholic beverages to persons in the state. The board shall approve an application if the common carrier certifies that it will meet the requirements under (c) and (d) of this section.

A common carrier delivering alcoholic beverages to a person in the state shall ensure that the package containing alcoholic beverages is delivered directly to a person who

presents identification and acceptable proof of age under AS

04.21.050

showing that the person is 21 years of age or older; and

provides a signature acknowledging that the person received the package.

A common carrier approved by the board under (b) of this section shall make records of shipments of alcoholic beverages to persons in the state available for inspection and audit by the board. The board may require periodic reporting of approved common carriers on a form prescribed by the board.

The board shall maintain, periodically review, and make available for public inspection a list of approved common carriers for transport and delivery of alcoholic beverages to persons in the state.

The board may remove a previously approved common carrier from the list if the common carrier transports or delivers alcoholic beverages in violation of (c) or (d) of this section.

In this section,

“common carrier” means a motor vehicle, watercraft, aircraft, or railroad car available for public hire to transport freight or passengers;

“transport” has the meaning given in AS

04.11.499(c)

.

A common carrier that has not been approved by the board to transport and deliver alcoholic beverages and that transports or delivers alcoholic beverages into or within the state commits the offense of unapproved common carrier transport or delivery of alcoholic beverages.

An approved common carrier that violates a provision under (c) or (d) of this section commits the offense of common carrier noncompliance for transport or delivery of alcoholic beverages.

Unapproved common carrier transport or delivery of alcoholic beverages is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

Common carrier noncompliance for transport or delivery of alcoholic beverages is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)